Utah statutes.
53B-16-101.   Establishment of institutional roles and general courses of
study.
(1)  Except as institutional roles are specifically assigned by the
Legislature, the board may establish and define the roles of the various
institutions of higher education under its control and management and shall
prescribe the general course of study to be offered at each institution.
(2)  In establishing and defining institutional roles, the board shall
consider the traditional roles of the separate institutions.
